Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-809
Audit.

The audit of any rural power district organized pursuant to Chapter 70, article 8, shall be conducted in the manner prescribed in section 84-304.01.

Laws 1993, LB 310, § 11.